District of Columbia statutes.
42-602

Deeds of corporations; formal requisites; acknowledgment.

The deed of a corporation shall be executed and acknowledged either (1) by an attorney-in-fact appointed for that purpose or (2) without appointment, by its president or a vice-president if also attested by the secretary or assistant secretary of the corporation.

Mar. 3, 1901, 31 Stat. 1268, ch. 854, § 497
June 30, 1902, 32 Stat. 531, ch. 1329
Apr. 27, 1994, D.C. Law 10-110, § 2(c), 41 DCR 1023
1973 Ed., § 45-302.
1981 Ed., § 45-502.
This section is referenced in § 42-401 and § 42-404.
Failures in formal requisites of an instrument, fraudulent acts, see § 42-404.
Effective date of deeds, see § 42-401.